Utah statutes.
34-20a-4.   Exclusive bargaining representative -- Selection -- Exclusions from negotiating team.

The organization selected by a majority of fire fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit shall act as the exclusive bargaining representative for all members of the department until recognition of such bargaining representative is withdrawn by a vote of a majority of the fire fighters in the department. No negotiating team of the established bargaining unit is appropriate which includes any fire chief, assistant chief, battalion or deputy chief, captain or lieutenant.

